Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1099.
do enact as follows:SB1099,11Section 1. 59.10 (1) (d) of the statutes is repealed and recreated to read:SB1099,2,3259.10 (1) (d) Vacancies. A vacancy on the board shall be filled as provided 3under s. 59.10 (3) (e).SB1099,24Section 2. 59.10 (3) (e) of the statutes is renumbered 59.10 (3) (e) 1. and 5amended to read:SB1099,2,9659.10 (3) (e) 1. If Except as provided under subd. 5., if a vacancy occurs on the 7board, the board chairperson shall publish a class 1 notice, under ch. 985, of the 8vacancy. The notice under this subdivision shall provide the procedure by which a 9person may apply to be considered for the vacant position.SB1099,2,13102. Except as provided under subd. 5., no earlier than 14 days after publishing 11the notice under subd. 1., the board chairperson, with the approval of the board, 12shall appoint a person who applied under subd. 1. and who is a qualified elector and 13resident of the supervisory district to fill the vacancy. The SB1099,2,17143. A successor appointed under subd. 2. shall serve for the unexpired portion 15of the term to which the person is appointed, unless the board orders a special 16election under subd. 4. to fill the vacancy, in which case the person appointed shall 17serve until his or her successor is elected and qualified.SB1099,3,2184. The board may, if a vacancy occurs before June 1 in the year preceding 19expiration of the term of office, order a special election to fill the vacancy. If the 20board orders a special election during the period beginning on June 1 and ending on 21November 30 of any year, the special election shall be held concurrently with the 22succeeding spring election. If the board orders a special election during the period 23beginning on December 1 and ending on May 31 of the succeeding year, the special 24election shall be held on the Tuesday after the first Monday in November following 1the date of the order. A person so elected under this subdivision shall serve for the 2residue of the unexpired term.SB1099,33Section 3. 59.10 (3) (e) 5. of the statutes is created to read:SB1099,3,7459.10 (3) (e) 5. A board chairperson may not appoint a person under subd. 2. 5to fill a vacancy that occurs after November 30 in the year preceding expiration of 6the term of office, and no notice under subd. 1. with regard to such a vacancy need 7be published.SB1099,3,88